Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2603.01
Protected consumer; security freeze; request; creation of record for protected consumer; placement of freeze.

(1) A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze for a protected consumer if:

(a) The consumer reporting agency receives a request from the representative for the placement of the security freeze under this section; and

(b) The representative:

(i) Submits the request to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency; and

(ii) Provides to the consumer reporting agency:

(A) Sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative; and

(B) Sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer.

(2) If a consumer reporting agency does not have a file pertaining to a protected consumer when the consumer reporting agency receives a request described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the consumer reporting agency shall create a record for the protected consumer.

(3) Within thirty days after receiving a request that meets the requirements of this section, a consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze for the protected consumer.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB757, § 2.